Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3102.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5832XC (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 423.4, subsection 9, paragraphs b and e, 1 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 b. The amount of the refund shall be calculated by 3 multiplying a designated rate by the total number of gallons 4 of biodiesel produced by the biodiesel producer in this state 5 during each quarter of a calendar year. The designated rate 6 shall be four five cents. 7 e. This subsection is repealed January 1, 2028 2031 . 8